Utah statutes.
53-5-703.   Board -- Membership -- Compensation -- Terms -- Duties.

(1)  There is created within the bureau the Concealed Firearm Review Board.

(2) (a)  The board is comprised of not more than five members appointed by the commissioner on a bipartisan basis.

(b)  The board shall include a member representing law enforcement and at least two citizens, one of whom represents sporting interests.

(3) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (3)(b), as terms of current board members expire, the commissioner shall appoint each new member or reappointed member to a four-year term.

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (3)(a), the commissioner shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that approximately half of the board is appointed every two years.

(4)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.

(5)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(6)  The board shall meet at least quarterly, unless the board has no business to conduct during that quarter.

(7)  The board, upon receiving a timely filed petition for review, shall review within a reasonable time the denial, suspension, or revocation of a permit or a temporary permit to carry a concealed firearm.



Amended by Chapter 62, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 286, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 324, 2010 General Session

